Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202550-2010
Public Counsel; complaint; conclusion or recommendation; consult with agency or person.

Before announcing a conclusion or recommendation that expressly or impliedly criticizes an administrative agency or any person, the Public Counsel shall consult with such agency or person.

Laws 1969, c. 762, § 9, p. 2882;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 81-8,248;

Laws 2025, LB298, § 10.